Washington statutes.
RCW 11.98.100

Nonliability for action or inaction based on lack of knowledge of events.

When the happening of any event, including but not limited to such events as marriage, divorce, performance of educational requirements, or death, affects the administration or distribution of the trust, then a trustee who has exercised reasonable care to ascertain the happening of the event is not liable for any action or inaction based on lack of knowledge of the event. A corporate trustee is not liable prior to receiving such knowledge or notice in its trust department office where the trust is being administered.

[ 1985 c 30 s 53. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 84; 1959 c 124 s 9. Formerly RCW 30.99.090.]

NOTES:

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.